twol/rules-common.twol
Alphabet
 А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я
 а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
 Ә ә Ң ң Җ җ Ў ў Ү ү
 %>:0 %+:0
 ;

Sets
 Vowel = а е ё и о у ы э ю я ә ў ү ;
 Cons  = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ң җ ;
 Labial = б п м ф в ;

Definitions

Rules

"Plural boundary deletion"
%>:0 <=> _ ;

"Clitic boundary deletion"
%+:0 <=> _ ;
